Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.635.040

Examination questions—Disclosing—Penalty.

Any person having access to any question or questions prepared for the examination of teachers or common school pupils, who shall directly or indirectly disclose the same before the time appointed for the use of the questions in the examination of such teachers or pupils, or who shall directly or indirectly assist any person to answer any question submitted, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, the penalty for which shall be a fine in any sum not less than one hundred nor more than five hundred dollars.

[ 1984 c 258 s 316; 1969 ex.s. c 199 s 58; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.87.070. Prior: 1909 c 97 p 357 s 1; RRS s 5043; prior: 1903 c 156 s 1; 1897 c 118 s 159. Formerly RCW 28A.87.070, 28.87.070.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.

Intent—1984 c 258: See note following RCW 3.34.130.